Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Chapter 35. Uniform Air Licensing Act.

Revisor’s notes. —

The Uniform Air Licensing Act from which this chapter was derived was withdrawn by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws in 1943.

Secs. 02.35.010 — 02.35.080.
Federal law followed; aircraft license required; airman license required; registration of aircraft; registration of airmen; proper officer to make and certify copies of licenses; receipts for certified copies; exceptions to application of chapter. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.35.090.
License and permit to be exhibited on request.

A certificate, permit, rating, or license required for an airman by the federal government shall be kept in the person’s personal possession when the person is operating in the state and shall be presented for inspection upon the demand of a peace officer or another officer of the state or of a municipality, or a member, official, or employee of the department or an official, manager, or person in charge of an airport upon which the airman lands, or upon the reasonable request of any other person. A certificate, permit, or license required by the federal government for an aircraft shall be carried in the aircraft at all times while the aircraft is operating in the state. It shall be conspicuously posted in the aircraft where it may be readily seen by passengers or inspectors, and shall be presented for inspection upon the demand of a peace officer or another officer of the state or of a municipality, or a member, official, or employee of the department, or an official, manager, or person in charge of an airport upon which the aircraft lands, or upon the reasonable request of any person.

History.

(§ 32-6-11 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1949)

Sec. 02.35.100.
Temporary permit. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.35.110.
Emergency rations and equipment.

An airman may not make a flight inside the state with an aircraft unless emergency equipment is carried as follows:

the following minimum equipment must be carried during the summer months:

rations for each occupant sufficient to sustain life for one week;

one axe or hatchet;

one first aid kit;

an assortment of tackle such as hooks, flies, lines, and sinkers;

one knife;

fire starter;

one mosquito headnet for each occupant;

two small signalling devices such as colored smoke bombs, railroad fuses, or Very pistol shells, in sealed metal containers;

in addition to the equipment required under (1) of this subsection, the following must be carried as minimum equipment from October 15 to April 1 of each year:

one pair of snowshoes;

one sleeping bag;

one wool blanket or equivalent for each occupant over four.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, operators of multi-engine aircraft licensed to carry more than 15 passengers need carry only the food, mosquito nets, and signalling equipment at all times other than the period from October 15 to April 1 of each year, when two sleeping bags, and one blanket for every two passengers shall also be carried.

All of the above requirements as to emergency rations and equipment are considered to be minimum requirements which are to remain in full force and effect, except as further safety measures may be from time to time imposed by the department.

History.

(§ 32-6-13 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 128 SLA 1949; am § 10 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was formerly the last sentence of subsection (b).
Relettered in 2010.
Also in 2010, in subsection (b), “Notwithstanding (a) of this section” was substituted for “However” in order to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 02.35.115.
Downed aircraft transmitting devices. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.35.120.
Penalties for lack of license or permit or violation of regulations.

A person who acts as an airman for a civil aircraft when flown or operated in this state without holding an existing airman’s license or permit issued in accordance with federal law, who flies or causes to be flown in this state any civil aircraft without an existing license or permit for that aircraft issued in accordance with federal law, or who violates a provision of a regulation adopted under this chapter is punishable by a fine of not more than $500 or by imprisonment for not more than six months or by both.

History.

(§ 32-6-14 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 11 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Sec. 02.35.130.
Penalty for violation of AS 02.35.090 and 02.35.110.

A person violating a provision of AS

02.35.090

and

02.35.110

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.

History.

(§ 7 ch 128 SLA 1949)

Sec. 02.35.140.
Uniformity of interpretation. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.35.150.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation and public facilities;

“department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1963)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section derives from the bulk formal revision of the laws of Alaska and was not a part of the law prior to the adoption and enactment of the revision, through the enactment of AS

01.05.006

in § 1, ch. 1, SLA 1963.

Sec. 02.35.160.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Air Licensing Act.

History.

(§ 32-6-16 ACLA 1949)